Arkansas, session 2025, HB1807.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-409(a), concerning the sales tax
exemption for aircraft held for resale and used for rental or charter, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Any person, whether an established business or an individual,
that is engaged in the business of selling aircraft in this state, and
holding holds a retail sales tax permit, and holds aircraft in stock for
resale may purchase aircraft exempt for resale and use the aircraft for
rental or charter service without payment of sales or use tax for a period of
not to exceed one (1) year from the date of purchase of the aircraft.
(2) In the case of aircraft purchased for resale which require
substantial modification or substantial refurbishing prior to resale, the
*JLL255*
04-07-2025 10:22:22 JLL255

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1807
purchaser may use the aircraft for rental or charter service without payment
of sales or use tax for a period of not to exceed two (2) years from the date
of purchase of the aircraft.
(3) As used in this subsection, "business of selling aircraft"
means the purchase of aircraft for stock in trade and the management of
aircraft inventory for the primary purpose of generating a profit from the
resale of aircraft to customers.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-52-409, concerning the sales tax
exemption for aircraft held for resale and used for rental or charter, is
amended to add additional subsections to read as follows:
(e)(1) A transaction in which a person acquires an aircraft for the
purpose of renting or leasing the aircraft in the ordinary course of the
person's business is exempt under this section only if the person establishes
that the annual amount of the gross revenue derived from renting or leasing
the aircraft, including any revenue from related party transactions, is equal
to at least seven and five-tenths percent (7.5%) of the net acquisition price
for the aircraft, including the value of any trade or exchange and excluding
any sales commission paid to a third party.
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration shall
promulgate rules to prescribe the method of establishing the annual amount of
gross lease revenue derived from renting or leasing an aircraft under this
subsection.
(f) The exemption allowed under this section applies regardless of the
relationship, if any, between the person providing the aircraft for rent or
lease and the person renting or leasing the aircraft.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
on the first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this
act.

/s/Eaves




04-07-2025 10:22:22 JLL255